Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2652
Persons dealing with conservators; protection.

A person who in good faith either assists a conservator or deals with him for value in any transaction, other than those requiring a court order as provided in section 30-2637, is protected as if the conservator properly exercised the power. The fact that a person knowingly deals with a conservator does not alone require the person to inquire into the existence of a power or the propriety of its exercise, except that restrictions on powers of conservators which are endorsed on letters as provided in section 30-2655 are effective as to third persons. A person is not bound to see to the proper application of estate assets paid or delivered to a conservator. The protection here expressed extends to instances in which some procedural irregularity or jurisdictional defect occurred in proceedings leading to the issuance of letters. The protection here expressed is not by substitution for that provided by comparable provisions of the laws relating to commercial transactions and laws simplifying transfers of securities by fiduciaries.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 270, UPC § 5-423.